dev/testp.dix
    <pardef n="roimh__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>roimhe</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>roimhesean</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>roimhe-sean</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>roimhe-seo</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>roimhe-sin</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" v="CM"><p><l>roimis</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" v="CM"><p><l>roimissean</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" v="CM"><p><l>roimis-sean</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" v="CM"><p><l>roimis-seo</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" v="CM"><p><l>roimis-sin</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>roimpi</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>roimpise</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>roimpi-se</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>roimpi-seo</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>roimpi-sin</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhat</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhatsa</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhat-sa</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhat-seo</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhat-sin</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhainn</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhainne</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhaibh</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhaibhse</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhaibh-se</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhaibh-seo</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhaibh-sin</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romham</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romhamsa</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romham-sa</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romham-seo</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>romham-sin</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>rompu</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>rompusan</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>rompu-san</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>rompu-seo</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>seo<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>rompu-sin</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>sin<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>roimh</l><r><a/>roimh<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>roimh</l><r>roimh<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="roimh" a="irishfst"><i/><par n="roimh__pr"/></e>
